Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202481-3144
Temporary Assistance for Needy Families program funds; report.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall electronically submit a report to the Health and Human Services Committee of the Legislature by November 1 of each year on the current and anticipated expenditures for the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families program funds allocated pursuant to the federal Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996, Public Law 104-193. Such report shall provide the committee with all necessary and appropriate information to enable the committee to conduct a meaningful evaluation of such expenditures. Such information shall include, but not be limited to:

(1) A clear description of programs and services currently funded by the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families program;

(2) A clear explanation of each purpose met by such program or service;

(3) For programs and services provided by entities other than the state, a clear description of the recipient of Temporary Assistance to Needy Families funds;

(4) For programs other than the aid to dependent children program, a clear statement explaining how an expenditure for that program or service is more likely to help families achieve economic mobility and self-sufficiency than an increase in expenditures for the aid to dependent children program;

(5) The number of persons served under each program or service; and

(6) All costs and expenditures associated with each program or service.

Laws 2024, LB62, § 4.
July 19, 2024